Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 9 Railroad Rates and Service

39-9-1.
Reasonable facilities and accommodations required.

Every railroad corporation doing business or owning any railroad, wholly or in part within the limits of this state, shall furnish reasonable and proper facilities and accommodations on the line of its road, within its limits, for the transportation of passengers and merchandise.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-1

.

39-9-2.
Abandonment of stations — Seasonal stations.

No railroad corporation shall abandon any railroad station that is on its road and in this state after the station has been established for twelve (12) months, except by permission of the commission; but the corporation may establish stations to be used only during certain months of each year, and for such trains, as they may designate by notice put up and maintained in some conspicuous place at the stations so established, specifying the months during which the station will be used.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 29; P.L. 1900, ch. 741, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-2

; P.L. 1973, ch. 199, § 7; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 5.

39-9-3.
Railroads as common carriers — Articles transported by connecting lines.

Every railroad corporation shall be deemed a common carrier; and whenever two (2) or more railroads are connected within this state, the corporation running either of the railroads shall receive articles for transportation to any place on the line of either of the railroads so connected, and shall be liable as common carriers for the delivery of articles at the place. If any corporation shall become liable to pay any sum by reason of the neglect or misconduct of any other corporation, the corporation paying the sum may collect the sum of the corporation by reason of whose neglect or misconduct it became so liable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-3

.

39-9-4.
Charges for transfer of shipments to connecting line.

Whenever merchandise is transported over any portion of two (2) railroads that form a connecting line, and the tracks of which so unite that cars can pass from one to another, no charge shall be made for the loading or unloading or for the carriage of the merchandise from the cars of one of the railroads to the cars of the other.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 25; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-4

.

39-9-5.
Services and facilities provided to other railroads.

Every railroad corporation owning a road in use, operated by steam power, shall, at reasonable times and for a reasonable compensation, draw over the same the passengers, merchandise, and cars of any other railroad corporation that connects with, or may be authorized by the legislature to enter with its road upon, or connect the same with and use, the road of the first named corporation; and shall also provide upon its road convenient and suitable depot accommodations for the passengers and merchandise of the other road passing to and over it, and shall receive and deliver the same in the manner it receives and delivers its own passengers and freight.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-5

.

39-9-6.
Determination of terms for services and facilities to other railroads.

If the corporations cannot agree upon the stated periods at which the cars shall be so drawn, and the compensation to be paid therefor, or cannot agree upon the terms and conditions upon which accommodations shall be furnished for passengers and merchandise, the supreme court, upon application by either party, shall appoint three (3) commissioners, who, after due notice to and hearing the parties interested, shall determine, having reference to the convenience and interest of the corporations and of the public to be accommodated thereby, the stated periods for drawing cars, and compensation therefor, or the terms and conditions for passengers and merchandise, or the requisite terminal accommodations and manner of transferring passengers and freight, as aforesaid; and upon the application of either party, shall determine all questions between them in relation to the transportation of freight and passengers and other business upon and connected with the roads in which they are jointly interested, and the manner in which the business shall be done; and shall apportion to the corporations their respective shares of the expenses, receipts, and income of the same; and the award of the commissioners or a majority of them, when approved by the court, shall be binding upon the respective corporations interested therein for one year and until commissioners appointed in like manner, upon application of either party, shall revise and alter the award.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 31; C.P.A. 1905, § 1226; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-6

.

39-9-7.
Award of commissioners to determine terms of services and facilities.

The compensation of the commissioners for services and expenses under §

39-9-6

shall be paid by the respective corporations in proportions as the commissioners shall determine and set forth as a part of their award; the award shall be returned to the court, and be subject to revision in all matters of law arising thereon, and the court may, by injunction or other suitable order, compel the performance of any final order of the commissioners, or of the court, under the provisions of §

39-9-6

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 32; C.P.A. 1905, § 1129; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-7

.

39-9-8.
Tariffs for transportation of milk.

No railroad corporation shall contract to furnish facilities for the transportation of milk, or shall carry it in large quantities over any portion of its line, without at the same time establishing a tariff under which it will receive, forward, and deliver milk by the can over the same portion of its line for any person tendering the same, so that the milk by the can shall be carried under fairly proportionate advantages in every respect, including price, time, and reasonable care for the same, as the milk carried in large quantities or under contract.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-8

.

39-9-9.
Fixing of rates for milk.

On the petition of a person desiring to forward milk over a railroad, the division of public utilities and carriers shall ascertain at what rate facilities for carriage of milk under contract or in large quantities are furnished by the railroad corporation, and shall compare the rate with the tariff for the carriage of milk by the can from and to the same places, including a reasonable compensation for the care of milk by the can; and if the tariff for care and carriage by the can is unreasonably more than the rate for its carriage under contract or in large quantities, the division of public utilities and carriers shall revise the tariff and fix rates therefor fairly proportionate with the contract or large quantity rates, and shall notify the corporation of the revision.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 36; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-9

.

39-9-10.
Forfeiture for failure to observe established rates for milk.

A corporation that refuses or neglects to receive, forward, or deliver milk by the can at the tariff rates so fixed and notified to it by the division of public utilities and carriers, shall forfeit to the person tendering the same ten dollars ($10.00) for each and every can it so refuses to receive or neglects to forward or deliver, to be recovered in action of tort.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-10

.

39-9-11.
Baggage of passengers.

Every passenger upon a railroad within the limits of this state shall have the privilege of taking with him or her upon any train, on which he or she is a passenger, personal baggage not exceeding eighty pounds (80 lbs.) in weight, without any charge on the part of the railroad company transporting the baggage, except the railroad fare of the passenger; and bicycles are hereby declared to be, and are decreed to be baggage, within the meaning of this section, and shall be by the railroad companies transported as baggage, subject to the same liabilities; provided, however, that no railroad company shall be required to transport more than one bicycle for a single person, and no passenger shall be required to crate, cover, or otherwise protect any bicycle.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 9; P.L. 1896, ch. 345, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-11

.

39-9-12.
Certificates for excess fare paid on train.

Every railroad corporation carrying passengers in cars propelled by steam, which shall collect in the cars a greater fare than the price for which a single passage ticket is sold from the station at which the passenger takes the train, shall issue to the passenger a certificate for such sum as the fare collected on the train exceeds the sum for which a single passage ticket for the same distance is sold at the ticket office of the company, which certificate shall be payable upon presentation at any ticket office of the corporation; and every railroad corporation that shall neglect or refuse to comply with the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense, one-half (1/2) to the use of the complainant and one-half (1/2) thereof to the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 42; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-12

.

39-9-13.
Accounts of revenues.

Every railroad corporation shall keep an account of the toll, freight, and passage money received at their depots and offices of receipt, and keep the same at all times in readiness for the examination of the general assembly, or the division of public utilities and carriers, or any committee that may be appointed by the general assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 187, § 38; G.L. 1909, ch. 215, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 251, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 124, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

39-9-13

.